Hawaii statutes.
§587A-11 Investigation; department powers.
Upon receiving a report that a child is subject to imminent harm, has been
harmed, or is subject to threatened harm, and when an assessment is required by
this chapter, the department shall cause such investigation to be made as it
deems to be appropriate. In conducting the investigation, the department may:

(1) Enlist the cooperation and assistance of
appropriate state and federal law enforcement authorities, who may conduct an
investigation and, if an investigation is conducted, shall provide the
department with all preliminary findings, including the results of a criminal
history record check of an alleged perpetrator of harm or threatened harm to
the child;

(2) Conduct a criminal history record check of an
alleged perpetrator and all adults living in the family home, with or without
consent, to ensure the safety of the child;

(3) Interview the child without the presence or prior
approval of the child's family and temporarily assume protective custody of the
child for the purpose of conducting the interview;

(4) Resolve the matter in an informal fashion that it
deems appropriate under the circumstances;

(5) Close the matter if the department finds, after
an assessment, that the child is residing with a caregiver who is willing and
able to meet the child's needs and provide a safe and appropriate placement for
the child;

(6) Immediately enter into a service plan:

(A) To safely maintain the child in the
family home; or

(B) To place the child in voluntary foster
care pursuant to a written agreement with the child's parent.

If the child is placed in voluntary foster care
and the family does not successfully complete the service plan within three
months after the date on which the department assumed physical custody of the
child, the department shall file a petition. The department is not required to
file a petition if the parents agree to adoption or legal guardianship of the
child and the child's safety is ensured; provided that the adoption or legal guardianship
hearing is conducted within six months of the date on which the department
assumed physical custody of the child;

(7) Assume temporary foster custody of the child and
file a petition with the court within three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays, after the date on which the department assumes temporary foster
custody of the child, with placement preference being given to an approved
relative; or

(8) File a petition or ensure that a petition is
filed by another appropriate authorized agency in court under this chapter. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 96, §4]

Case Notes

Cited: 132 H. 368, 322 P.3d 263 (2014).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next